Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,160
Contractor; insurance required.

A water-based fire protection system contractor shall maintain general and completed operations liability insurance for installation, inspection, and testing of water-based fire protection systems providing at least one million dollars of coverage.

Laws 1997, LB 636, § 3.